New Jersey, session 221, S2428.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. There is established the Eagleton Science and Politics Fellowship Program at the Eagleton Institute of Politics 1[of] at1 Rutgers 1, the State1 University.  Scientists, engineers, and health care professionals with a PhD or equivalent doctoral professional degree in natural sciences, engineering, or healthcare shall be selected to participate in the program as fellows. b. The State shall appropriate funds in each fiscal year to the Eagleton Institute of Politics at Rutgers, the State University to finance the stipends and benefits provided to 1[six] a minimum of four1 fellows pursuant to subsection c. of this section, and for the cost of administering the 1Eagleton1 Science and Politics Fellowship Program. c. 1[Six] A minimum of four1 fellows shall be selected each year and shall be assigned to work with the New Jersey Legislature and the Executive Branch.  The fellows shall be referred to as the John Weingart Science Fellows. 1[Three] At least two of the1 fellows shall be assigned to work with the Legislature, 1[with each fellow] and at least two of the fellows shall be assigned to work in the Executive Branch.  Each fellow assigned to work with the Legislature shall be1 placed in either the Office of Legislative Services, the Senate Majority Office, the Senate Minority Office, the General Assembly Majority Office, or the General Assembly Minority Office.  1[Three] Of the1 fellows 1[shall be]1 assigned to work in the Executive Branch1[.  Placement] , placement1 shall be determined by the Director of the 1Eagleton1 Science and Politics Fellowship Program, appointed pursuant to subsection d. of this section, in consultation with interested State offices. Each fellow shall receive a stipend during the period of 1the1 fellowship, as well as health, dental, and vision benefits for the term of their fellowship.  Each fellow shall participate for a period of one year on a full time basis. d.   The Director of the Eagleton Institute of Politics 1[of] at1 Rutgers, the State University shall appoint the 1[director] Director1 of the 1Eagleton1 Science and Politics Fellowship Program, who shall administer the program and recruit and select the fellows. 2.   1a.1  Notwithstanding any other funds allocated, there is appropriated from the State General Fund to the Eagleton Institute of Politics 1[of] at1 Rutgers, the State University for the 1Eagleton1 Science and Politics Fellowship Program the sum of 1[$338,000] $360,0001 for the stipends and the administrative costs of the program, implementing the provisions of 1[this act,]1 P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 1b.  Commencing in State fiscal year 2025, there shall be annually appropriated from the General Fund to the Eagleton Institute of Politics at Rutgers, the State University for the Eagleton Science and Politics Fellowship Program, a minimum of $520,000 to support the program.1 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.